en: Tropezian pies
de: Tarte Tropezienne, Kuchen aus Saint-Tropez
es: Tartas tropezianas
fi: Tropezian piirakat
fr: Tartes tropéziennes, Tarte tropézienne, Gâteaux tropéziens, Gâteau tropézien, tropézienne
hr: Tropeške pite
it: Torte tropeziane
ja: トロペジアンパイ
nl: Tropézienne taart
ru: Тропезийские пироги

en: Tartlets
bg: Тарталети
de: Törtchen
es: Tartaletas
fi: Tarteletit
fr: Tartelettes, tartelette
hr: Tartlete
it: Tortine
nl: Taartjes

en: Crostatina
xx: Crostatina
fr: Crostatina
it: Crostatina

en: Fruit tartlets
de: Obsttörtchen
fr: Tartelettes aux fruits entiers ou coupés, Tartelettes aux fruits
hr: Voćne tartlete
it: crostatine alla frutta

en: Blueberry tartlets
de: Blaubeerentörtchen
es: Tartaletas de arándanos
fr: Tartelettes à la myrtille, tartelette à la myrtille
hr: Tartlete od borovnice
it: Tortini di mirtilli
nl: Bosbessentaartjes

en: Strawberry tartlets
de: Erdbeer Törtchen
es: Tartaletas De Fresas
fr: Tartelettes à la fraise, Tartelettes aux fraises, tartelette à la fraise, Tartelette aux fraises
hr: Tartlets od jagoda
it: Tortini alle fragole
nl: Aardbeientaartjes

en: Raspberry tartlets
de: Himbeer Törtchen
fr: Tartelettes à la framboise, Tartelettes aux framboises
hr: Tartlets od malina
it: Tortini di lampone
nl: Frambozentaartjes

en: Apricot tartlets
de: Aprikosentörtchen
es: Tartaletas de albaricoque
fi: Aprikoositortut
fr: Tartelettes à l'abricot
hr: Tartlete od marelice
it: Tortini all'albicocca
nl: Abrikozentaartjes

en: Lemon tartlets
de: Zitronentörtchen
es: Tartaletas de limón
fi: Sitruunatortut
fr: Tartelettes au citron
hr: Tartlets od limuna
it: Tortini al limone, Crostatina al limone
nl: Citroentaartjes

en: Pear tartlets
de: Birnentörtchen
es: Tartaletas de pera
fr: Tartelettes à la poire
hr: Tartlete od krušaka
it: Tortini di pera
nl: Peertaartjes

en: Frozen fruit tartlets
fr: Tartelettes aux fruits surgelées

en: Products sold before year 2000, products sold before 2000
de: Produkte die vor dem Jahr 2000 verkauft wurden, Produkte die vor 2000 verkauft wurden
fi: tuotteet, joita myytiin ennen vuotta 2000
fr: Produits vendus avant l’an 2000, Produits vendus avant 2000
hr: Proizvodi prodani prije 2000. godine
nl: Producten verkocht voor 2000

en: Products sold in the 1950s
de: Produkte in den 1950er Jahren verkauft
fr: Produits vendus dans les années 1950
hr: Proizvoda prodanih 1950-ih
nl: Producten verkocht in de jaren 50

en: Products sold in the 1960s
de: Produkte in den 1960er Jahren verkauft
fr: Produits vendus dans les années 1960
hr: Proizvoda prodanih 1960-ih
nl: Producten verkocht in de jaren 60

en: Products sold in the 1970s
de: Produkte in den 1970er Jahren verkauft
es: Productos vendidos en la década de 1970
fr: Produits vendus dans les années 1970
hr: Proizvoda prodanih 1970-ih
it: Prodotti venduti negli anni '70
nl: Producten verkocht in de jaren 70

en: Products sold in the 1980s
de: Produkte in den 1980er Jahren verkauft
es: Productos vendidos en la década de 1980
fr: Produits vendus dans les années 1980
hr: Proizvoda prodanih 1980-ih
it: Prodotti venduti negli anni '80
nl: Producten verkocht in de jaren 80

en: Products sold in the 1990s
de: Produkte in den 1990er Jahren verkauft
es: Productos vendidos en la década de 1990
fi: Tuotteet myytiin 1990-luvulla
fr: Produits vendus dans les années 1990
hr: Proizvoda prodanih 1990-ih
it: Prodotti venduti negli anni '90
nl: Producten verkocht i de jaren 90

en: Products without gluten, gluten-free products, gluten free
bg: Продукти без глутен
cs: Bezlepkové potraviny
da: Produkter uden gluten, Glutenfri produkter
de: Glutenfrei
es: Productos sin gluten
fi: gluteeniton
fr: Produits sans gluten, Produits ne contenant pas de gluten, Pas de gluten, Absence de gluten
he: מוצרים ללא גלוטן
hr: Proizvodi bez glutena
hu: Gluténmentes termékek
it: Prodotti senza glutine
nl: Glutenvrije producten
pl: Produkty bezglutenowe
pt: Produtos sem glútem
ru: Безглютеновые продукты
sv: Produkter utan gluten, Glutenfria produkter

en: Gluten free bread mixes
bg: Смеси за безглутенов хляб
ca: Mescles de pa sense gluten
da: Glutenfri brødblandinger
de: Glutenfreie Brotmischungen
es: Mezclas de pan sin gluten
fi: Gluteenittomat leipäsekoitukset
fr: Préparations pour pain sans gluten
he: תערובות לחמים ללא גלוטן
hr: Smjese za kruh bez glutena
hu: Gluténmentes kenyérkeverékek
it: Preparati per pane senza glutine
ja: グルテンフリーのパンミックス
nl: Glutenvrije broodmixes
pl: Mieszanki do pieczenia chleba bezglutenowego
pt: Misturas para pão sem glúten
ru: Смеси для выпечки хлеба без глютена
zh: 无麸质面包混合物

en: Sandwiches, Sandwich
bg: Сандвичи
ca: Sanvitxos, entrepans
da: Sandwich
de: Sandwiches
es: Sándwiches, Sándwich
fi: valmiit voileivät
fr: Sandwichs, Sandwich, sandwiches
he: כריכים, סנדוויצ׳ים, סנדוויצ'ים
hr: Sendviče
hu: Szendvicsek
it: Panini
ja: サンドイッチ
nl: Sandwiches, Belegde broodjes
pl: Kanapki, kanapka
pt: Sanduiches
ru: Бутерброды
zh: 三明治